hunspell/mhr/mari.aff
FLAG long
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкемже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкемжак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкемжат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкемжыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешемже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешемжак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешемжат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешемжыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемжыде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемжыдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемжыдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемжыдес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычет .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетын .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетлан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычланет .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетым .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетла .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштет .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкет .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешет .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшын .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшылан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыланак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыланат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетланже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетланжак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетланжат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетланжыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшым .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшымак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшымат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшымыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыла .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшылак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшылат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшылас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыгеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыгеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыгес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешетше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешетшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешетшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешетшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетшыдес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшын .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшылан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычланже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшым .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыла .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычна .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычланна .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнам .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнала .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнаге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштына .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкына .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешна .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнаде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнаже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажын .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажылан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыланак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыланат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналанже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналанжак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналанжат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналанжыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажым .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажымак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажымат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажымыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыла .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажылак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажылат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажылас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыгеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыгеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыгес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынаже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынажак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынажат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынажыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкынаже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкынажак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкынажат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкынажыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешнаже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешнажак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешнажат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешнажыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнажыдес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычда .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдалан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычланда .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдам .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдала .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыда .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыда .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешда .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажын .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыдак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыдат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажылан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыладак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыладат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаланже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаланжак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаланжат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаланжыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажым .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажымак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажымат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажымыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыла .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажылак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажылат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажылас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыгеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыгеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыгес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыдаже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыдажак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыдажат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыдажыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыдаже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыдажак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыдажат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыдажыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешдаже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешдажак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешдажат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешдажыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдажыдес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышт .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштын .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштлан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычланышт .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштым .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштла .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштышт .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкышт .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешышт .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшын .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшылан .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыланак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыланат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштланже .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштланжак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштланжат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштланжыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшым .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшымак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшымат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшымыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыла .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшылак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшылат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшылас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыге .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыгеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыгеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыгес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыштше .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыштшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыштшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыштшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыде .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштшыдес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемланак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемымак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемлак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемгеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштемак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкемак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешемак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетланак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетымак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетлак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетгеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешетак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыланак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшымак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшылак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыгеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыжак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкышак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыжак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнанак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналанак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнамак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнагеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешнак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнадеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычданак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаланак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдамак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдалак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдагеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыдак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыдак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешдак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдадеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштланак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштымак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштлак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштгеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыштак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыштак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыштак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштдеак .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемланат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемымат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемлат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемгеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштемат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкемат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешемат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетланат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетымат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетлат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетгеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешетат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыланат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшымат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшылат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыгеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыжат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкышат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыжат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнанат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналанат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнамат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнагеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешнат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнадеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычданат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаланат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдамат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдалат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдагеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыдат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыдат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешдат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдадеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштланат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштымат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштлат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштгеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыштат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыштат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыштат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштдеат .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемыныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемымыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемлас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемгес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштемыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкемыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешемыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычемдес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетыныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетымыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетлас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетгес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштетыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкетыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешетыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычетдес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшымыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшылас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыгес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыжыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкышыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыжыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычшыдес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнаныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналаныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнамыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычналас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнагес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштынас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкынас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешнас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычнадес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычданыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдаланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдамыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдалас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдагес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыдас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыдас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешдас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычдадес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыныс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштланыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштымыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштлас .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштгес .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштыштыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычышкыштыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычешыштыс .
SFX O2 0 -шамычыштдес .
